Utah statutes.
78B-4-403.   Bar against claim or recovery from operator for injury from risks inherent in sport.

Notwithstanding anything in Sections 78B-5-817 through 78B-5-823 to the contrary, no skier may make any claim against, or recover from, any ski area operator for injury resulting from any of the inherent risks of skiing.

